Colorado statutes. TITLE 28 Military and Veterans
PART 1
GENERAL AND ADMINISTRATIVE

28-3-101. Definitions.

As used in this article 3, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Active service" means full-time service on behalf of the state when ordered by competent authority.

"Armed forces" means the Army, Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, Space Force, and Coast Guard of the United States.

"Board" means the Colorado board of veterans affairs.

"County veterans service officer" means any person appointed to serve as such pursuant to section 28-5-801.

"Department" means the department of military and veterans affairs created and existing pursuant to section 24-1-127, C.R.S.

"Director" means the director of the division of veterans affairs.

"Division" or "division of veterans affairs" means the division of veterans affairs created and existing within the department of military and veterans affairs.

"In the service of the United States" and "not in the service of the United States" mean the same as such terms are used in the "National Defense Act of Congress", approved June 3, 1916, and amendments thereto.

"Master settlement agreement" means the master settlement agreement, the smokeless tobacco master settlement agreement, and the consent decree approved and entered by the court in the case denominated State of Colorado, ex rel. Gale A. Norton, Attorney General v. R.J. Reynolds Tobacco Co.; American Tobacco Co., Inc.; Brown & Williamson Tobacco Corp.; Liggett & Myers, Inc.; Lorillard Tobacco Co., Inc.; Philip Morris, Inc.; United States Tobacco Co.; B.A.T. Industries, P.L.C.; The Council For Tobacco Research--U.S.A., Inc.; and Tobacco Institute, Inc., Case No. 97 CV 3432, in the district court for the city and county of Denver.

"Military forces" includes the federally recognized National Guard and any other organizations or components of the organized militia as may be created by the governor pursuant to federal or state law.

"Military service" means service in any of the armed forces of the state of Colorado or the United States.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (12) is effective until notice to the revisor of statutes that the Space National Guard is created is received. See editor's note following this section.] "National Guard" includes the Army National Guard and the Air National Guard.

(12)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (12) is effective upon notice to the revisor of statutes that the Space National Guard is created. See editor's note following this section.

]

"National Guard" includes the Army National Guard, the Air National Guard, and the Space National Guard.

"On duty" includes periods of drill and such other training and service as may be required under state or federal law, regulations, or orders.

(13.5) "Saboteur" means a person who intentionally destroys, damages, moves, or interferes with any property with reasonable grounds to believe that the act will interfere with the preparation of the United States or any state for defense or for war or with the prosecution of war by the United States.

(13.7) "Terrorist" means a person who has engaged in, or is suspected of engaging in, acts of terrorism, as that term is defined in 18 U.S.C. sec. 3077 (1), as amended.

"Trust fund" means the Colorado state veterans trust fund created in section 28-5-709.

"Veteran" means a person who served in the active military, naval, or air service of the United States, and who was discharged or released therefrom under conditions other than dishonorable.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 606, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-1.

L. 2002:

(13.5) and (13.7) added, p. 584, § 1, effective May 24; entire section R&RE, p. 343, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

IP and (2) amended (HB 21-1231), ch. 206, p. 1077, § 5, effective May 28; IP and (12) amended (HB 21-1231), ch. 206, p. 1077, § 6, effective (see editor's note).

28-3-102. Persons subject to military duty. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 55:

p. 606, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-2.

L. 75:

(1)(f) amended, p. 932, § 50, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

Entire section repealed, p. 584, § 2, effective May 24.

Cross references:

For current provisions concerning persons subject to military duty, see § 28-4-103.5.

28-3-103. General provisions.

In case the United States is at war or in case of any other emergency declared by the president or the congress of the United States or by the governor or the general assembly of this state, any organization, unit, or detachment of the military forces of this state, by direction of the governor and upon order of the officer in immediate command thereof, may continue in fresh pursuit of insurrectionists, saboteurs, terrorists, enemies, or enemy forces beyond the border of this state into another state until they are apprehended or captured by such organization, unit, or detachment or until the military or police forces of such other state or the forces of the United States have had a reasonable opportunity to pick up the pursuit or to apprehend or capture the persons pursued, if such other state has given authority by law for such pursuit by such forces of this state. Except as provided by law, any person who is apprehended or captured in another state by any of the forces of this state shall, without unnecessary delay, be surrendered to the military or police forces of the state in which he or she is taken or to the United States, but such surrender shall not constitute a waiver by this state of its right to extradite or prosecute such person for any crime committed in this state.

Any military forces of another state who are in fresh pursuit of insurrectionists, saboteurs, terrorists, enemies, or enemy forces may continue such pursuit into this state until the military or police forces of this state or the forces of the United States have had a reasonable opportunity to take up the pursuit or to apprehend or capture the persons pursued, and the pursuing forces may arrest or capture such persons within this state while in fresh pursuit. Any such persons who are captured or arrested by the military forces of such other state while in this state shall, without unnecessary delay, be surrendered to the military or police forces of this state to be dealt with according to law.

This section shall not be construed so as to make unlawful any arrest in this state which would otherwise be lawful nor to repeal or prevent the application of any of the provisions of sections 16-3-104 and 16-3-106, C.R.S.

The intent of this article and all acts of the state affecting the military forces is to conform to all acts and regulations of the United States affecting the same subjects, and all acts of the state shall be construed to effect this purpose, and anything to the contrary shall be held null and void so long as the subject matter has been acted on by the United States, and, upon any subject not acted upon with reference to these matters by United States authority, any act of the state shall be in full force and effect. Nothing in this subsection (4) shall be construed to limit in any way the application of this article to the discipline of the Colorado National Guard when on "active service" or "on duty" as defined in section 28-3-101.

All matters relating to the organization, discipline, and government of the military forces not otherwise provided for in this article shall be decided by the custom, regulations, and usage of the appropriate service of the armed forces of the United States.

The military forces of the state of Colorado shall be divided into two classes - the organized militia and the unorganized militia.

The organized militia shall consist of the following:

The federally recognized National Guard; and

The state defense force.

The unorganized militia shall consist of all other members of the military forces.

Consistent with federal law, women may enlist in the state military forces in the same manner as men and shall be appointed by the governor in the same manner as men. While so serving in the state military forces, women shall have the same status as male members of the state military forces, consistent with federal law.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 607, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-3.

L. 69:

p. 868, § 1.

L. 71:

p. 1047, § 9.

L. 86:

(7)(b) amended, p. 1016, § 8, effective May 3.

L. 95:

(9) amended, p. 319, § 1, effective April 21.

L. 2002:

(1), (2), and (7) amended and (9) R&RE, pp. 584, 585, §§ 3, 4, effective May 24.

28-3-104. Commander in chief - staff.

The governor shall be the commander in chief of the military forces except so much thereof as may be in the actual service of the United States and may employ the same for the defense or relief of the state, the enforcement of its laws, the protection of life and property therein, and the implementation of the Emergency Management Assistance Compact; for service in a national special security event or in situations involving imminent danger of emergency or disaster; and for the training of the military forces for all appropriate state missions. He or she shall make and publish regulations not inconsistent with law and enforce the provisions of this article. He or she may appoint a staff, consisting of an adjutant general as chief of staff and such other officers as he or she deems necessary if all such officers are federally recognized officers in their respective ranks in the National Guard of the state.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 609, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-4.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, pp. 585, 593, §§ 5, 27, effective May 24.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (HB 09-1325), ch. 315, p. 1702, § 1, effective May 21.

Editor's note:

Amendments to this section by sections 5 and 27 of Senate Bill 02-099 were harmonized.

Cross references:

For the "Emergency Management Assistance Compact", see part 29 of article 60 of title 24.

28-3-105. Adjutant general - assistants.

There is an adjutant general of the state who is appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, who must be a staff officer, who at the time of appointment must be a commissioned officer of the National Guard of this state with not fewer than ten years' military service in the armed forces of this state or of the United States, at least five of which have been commissioned service in the Colorado National Guard, and who has attained the grade of lieutenant colonel or a higher grade with federal recognition in such grade at least one year prior to the individual's appointment as adjutant general. The adjutant general serves at the pleasure of the governor. The adjutant general is a type 2 entity, as defined in section 24-1-105.

The adjutant general shall be appointed to the rank of brigadier general or to such higher grade or rank as he or she may be federally recognized in.

The adjutant general shall receive as compensation such salary as the governor by order may prescribe, but such salary shall not exceed the pay and allowances as provided by law for an officer of similar rank and length of service in the regular Army or regular Air Force of the United States.

The adjutant general may appoint an assistant adjutant general for Army, an assistant adjutant general for air, and an assistant adjutant general for space. The adjutant general may appoint other assistant adjutant generals that may be authorized by the federal National Guard bureau or as authorized by the governor. In addition, the adjutant general may appoint any necessary administrative and clerical assistants.

No adverse personnel action shall be taken against an officer or enlisted member of the military forces as a consequence of communicating with any member of the general assembly.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 609, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-5.

L. 69:

p. 868, § 2.

L. 71:

p. 1045, § 2.

L. 95:

(1) amended and (5) added, p. 319, § 2, effective April 21.

L. 2002:

(1), (2), and (4) amended, p. 594, § 28, effective May 24.

L. 2003:

(4) amended, p. 1907, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2022:

(1) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3417, § 186, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the short title (the "Debbie Haskins 'Administrative Organization Act of 1968' Modernization Act") in SB 22-162, see section 1 of chapter 469, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

28-3-106. Powers and duties of adjutant general.

The adjutant general has the following powers and duties:

The adjutant general shall be the chief of staff to the commander in chief and the administrative head of the department of military and veterans affairs. Whenever any law of this state refers to the military department, said law shall be construed as referring to the department of military and veterans affairs.

He or she shall have custody of all military records, correspondence, and other military documents. He or she shall be the medium of military correspondence with the governor and perform all other duties pertaining to his or her office prescribed by law.

The adjutant general shall prepare and transmit annually, in the form and manner prescribed by the heads of the principal departments pursuant to the provisions of section 24-1-136, C.R.S., a report accounting to the governor and the state, veterans, and military affairs committees of the house of representatives and the senate for the efficient discharge of all responsibilities assigned by law or directive to the adjutant general.

He or she shall make and transmit to the federal government such reports and returns as are required by the laws of the United States.

He or she shall, when necessary and pursuant to the provisions of section 24-1-136, C.R.S., cause the military code, orders, and regulations of the state to be reproduced and distributed to the commissioned officers and the several organizations of the National Guard.

He or she shall cause to be prepared and issued all necessary books, blanks, and notices required to carry into full effect the provisions of the military code. All such books and blanks are the property of the state.

The seal of office of the adjutant general shall contain the coat of arms of the state with the words added thereto "State of Colorado, Adjutant General's Office", and said seal shall be delivered by him or her to his or her successor. All orders issued from his or her office shall be authenticated with said seal. The adjutant general shall attest to all commissions issued to officers of the military forces.

He or she shall superintend the preparation of all returns and reports required by the United States from the state on military matters.

In the absence of the adjutant general or temporary inability to perform his or her duties as adjutant general, he or she shall appoint, with the consent of the governor, an officer of the National Guard to perform the duties prescribed for the adjutant general. Should the adjutant general be absent or unable to perform his or her duties for a period of six months or more, it shall be considered cause to justify his or her removal. Removal under this paragraph (i) shall be at the sole discretion of the governor.

He or she shall prescribe such regulations not inconsistent with law as will increase the discipline and efficiency and will preserve and protect the property of the military forces of the state of Colorado. These regulations, as prepared by the adjutant general and approved by the governor, shall be published in orders, and the governor, when in his or her judgment it is necessary, may order the adjutant general to revise and amend these regulations. The regulations required by this paragraph (j) need not comply with the provisions of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

He or she shall submit a budget respecting the military forces for the ensuing fiscal year for the approval of the controller, and the total of the budget for such period of time shall not be exceeded.

He or she shall keep the papers, volumes, and records of the department in an office provided by the state and shall keep such accounts of activities and expenditures as are necessary and required.

He or she shall attend to the safekeeping and repairing of the ordnance, arms, accouterments, equipment, and all other military property belonging to the state or issued to it by the United States. All military property of the state which, after proper inspection, is found unsuitable for the use of the state, under the direction of the governor, shall be disposed of by the adjutant general at public auction or by inviting bids after suitable advertisement of the sale daily for ten days in at least one newspaper published in the city or county where the sale is to take place; or the same may be sold at private sale when so ordered by the governor or, with the approval of the governor, may be turned over to any other department, board, or commission of the state government by which it can be used. Such department, board, or commission of the state government shall reimburse the military fund for the reasonable value of the property so received. He or she shall bid on the property or suspend the sale when in his or her opinion better prices may or should be obtained. He or she shall from time to time render to the governor a just and true account of the sales made by him or her and shall deposit the proceeds of the same in the military fund.

He or she shall not issue or cause to be issued military property to persons or organizations other than those belonging to the National Guard, except in cases of emergency and then only on written approval of the governor.

All purchases, with the exception of emergency purchases, shall be made through the executive director of the department of personnel in the manner provided by law. All property purchased under the authority granted shall be inspected by an inspector or an officer detailed for that purpose by the adjutant general, and no payment shall be made therefor until it appears by the certificate of such officer that such property is of the kind and quality specified in such agreement or contract. In case of emergency, the governor may suspend the operation of this paragraph (o) and direct the adjutant general in writing to purchase such military property as may be required in the open market. The governor shall report such actions with the reasons therefor and statement of the property purchased and the prices paid therefor to the general assembly at its next session. All payments shall be made by voucher drawn upon the military fund of the state upon such form as may be provided by the controller of the state of Colorado. Each voucher shall show the attestation of the adjutant general that it is within the budget as approved by the governor.

He or she shall employ such clerks, laborers, and other force as may be required for his or her office, other departments, armories, and properties of the National Guard, and, in all cases of employment under this provision, a preference shall be extended to members of the National Guard. The pay of such clerks and other force shall be determined and fixed by the adjutant general with the approval of the governor and consistent with the pay for equivalent positions under the state personnel system. In case of emergency or when authorized by the governor, he or she may employ such additional temporary assistants as are necessary, to be paid from the amounts appropriated for the maintenance of the military forces.

The adjutant general shall have charge of the campgrounds and military reservations of the state and shall be responsible for the protection and safety thereof, and he or she shall promulgate regulations for the maintenance of order thereon, for the enforcement of traffic rules, and for all other lawful regulations as may be ordered for the operation, care, and preservation of existing facilities and installations on all state military reservations. He or she shall keep in repair all state buildings and other improvements thereon. He or she may make such sound improvements thereon as the good of the service requires.

The adjutant general, by and with the advice and approval of the governor, is authorized to rent, hire, purchase, take the conveyance of, and hold in trust for the use of the state of Colorado such buildings, lands, tenements, and appurtenances thereof as may be from time to time deemed necessary for use by the National Guard. All such expenditures shall be paid out of the military fund, but all titles shall be taken in the name of the governor of the state of Colorado for the use of the National Guard. Prior to acquiring any real property pursuant to the provisions of this paragraph (r), the adjutant general shall submit a report to the capital development committee which describes the anticipated use of such real property, the maintenance costs related to such real property, the current value of such real property, any conditions or limitations which may restrict the use of such real property, and any potential liability to the state which could result from acquiring such real property. The capital development committee shall review any such report which is submitted to the capital development committee and shall provide recommendations to the adjutant general concerning the proposed real property acquisition within thirty days after the date of receipt of such report. The adjutant general shall not complete any such real property acquisition without considering any recommendations of the capital development committee which are provided within such thirty-day period.

If, in the judgment of the adjutant general, any real estate that has been acquired for military purposes is unsuitable for military purposes, the adjutant general, by and with the approval of the governor, in writing, has authority to sell, trade, or otherwise dispose of such real estate, but, except as otherwise provided by subsection (1)(s)(II) of this section, such real estate shall not be disposed of for less than its appraised value. The appraised value of such real estate shall be determined by an appraiser who is licensed or certificated pursuant to part 6 of article 10 of title 12 and who is selected by the adjutant general from a list of three qualified individuals submitted to the adjutant general by the department. Appraisers shall be selected for the list, and their fees shall be negotiated in accordance with the standards established by part 14 of article 30 of title 24. The adjutant general, by and with the advice and approval of the governor, is authorized to lease any property belonging to the department when it is not needed for the immediate use of the department. All conveyances that are required for the purpose of this section shall be executed by the governor under the seal of the state, and the proceeds of all sales, trades, or other disposition shall be placed in an account to be invested by the state treasurer as provided in section 24-36-113. Any interest earned on the investment or deposit of such proceeds shall remain in such account and shall not be credited to the general fund or any other fund of the state. Said proceeds and any interest thereon shall be disbursed by authority of the adjutant general, subject to appropriation by the general assembly, only for the construction, repair, improvement, acquisition, or costs of acquisition or sale of armories throughout the state. Costs of acquisition or sale shall include but need not be limited to appraisals, site surveys, environmental surveys, title work, property inspections, closing costs, legal fees, real estate fees, site preparation, or utility studies. Prior to disposing of any real property pursuant to the provisions of this subsection (1)(s), the adjutant general shall submit a report to the capital development committee that describes such real property, the maintenance costs related to such real property, the current value of such real property, any conditions or limitations that may restrict the use of such real property, and the terms of the proposed disposition of such real property. The capital development committee shall review any such report that is submitted to the capital development committee and shall provide recommendations to the adjutant general concerning the proposed real property disposition within thirty days after the date of receipt of such report. The adjutant general shall not complete any such real property disposition without considering any recommendations of the capital development committee that are provided within such thirty-day period.

The adjutant general may dispose of real estate acquired but unsuitable for military purposes for less than its appraised value when the disposition is to an agency of state government. The adjutant general shall not be required to have an appraisal performed in order to complete such disposition. In the event an offer has been made to purchase such real estate for more than its appraised value, prior to any disposition the adjutant general shall give due consideration to the terms of the offer and to any cost savings to the state which would result from a transfer of such real estate to a state agency.

Notwithstanding subsection (1)(s)(I) of this section, on July 1, 2020, the state treasurer shall transfer four million nine hundred eight thousand three hundred ninety-five dollars from the account specified in subsection (1)(s)(I) of this section to the general fund.

Repealed.

He or she shall prescribe the rules and regulations described in section 23-7.4-302 (7).

The adjutant general shall ensure that the department complies with the requirements of section 24-1-136.5, C.R.S., concerning the preparation of operational master plans, facilities master plans, and facilities program plans for the department.

Repealed.

The adjutant general is authorized to accept gifts, grants, or donations of any kind from any private source or from any governmental unit in order to carry out the functions and duties set forth in this title subject to the conditions upon which the gifts, grants, or donations are made; except that no gift, grant, or donation shall be accepted if the conditions attached thereto require the use or expenditure thereof in a manner contrary to law or require expenditures from the general fund unless such expenditures are approved by the general assembly.

The adjutant general may make available for public or private use any distance learning audio and video facilities located within the state. Such public or private use shall be subject to reasonable fees for the costs, including repair, replacement, and salaries involved in the use of the facilities, as well as maintenance and operation of the facilities and equipment.

Source:

L. 55:

p. 610, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 94-9-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 94-1-6.

L. 64:

p. 157, § 104.

L. 67:

p. 78, § 1.

L. 68:

p. 136, § 168.

L. 81:

(1)(o) amended, p. 1296, § 37, effective January 1, 1982.

L. 83:

(1)(c) and (1)(e) amended, p. 840, § 64, effective July 1.

L. 86:

(1)(s) amended and (1)(t) repealed, pp. 1014, 1018, §§ 1, 18, effective May 3.

L. 91:

(1)(r) amended, p. 1375, § 1, effective April 1; (1)(u) added, p. 549, § 3, effective May 18.

L. 94:

(1)(s) amended, p. 24, § 1, effective March 2; (1)(v) added, p. 566, § 15, effective April 6; (1)(s) amended, p. 1617, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 96:

(1)(o) amended, p. 1542, § 133, effective June 1.

L. 2001:

(1)(c) amended, p. 1178, § 10, effective August 8.

L. 2002:

(1)(b), (1)(d) to (1)(n), (1)(p), (1)(q), and (1)(u) amended, pp. 594, 586, §§ 29, 7, effective May 24; (1)(a) and (1)(s)(I) amended and (1)(w) added, p. 360, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(1)(c) and (1)(w)(I) amended, p. 2012, § 104, effective May 22; (1)(x) and (1)(y) added, p. 1907, § 2, effective August 6.

L. 2005:

(1)(s)(I) amended, p. 661, § 1, effective May 27.

L. 2013:

(1)(s)(I) amended, (SB 13-155), ch. 392, p. 2284, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2018:

(1)(u) amended, (HB 18-1228), ch. 103, p. 787, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2019:

(1)(s)(I) amended, (HB 19-1172), ch. 136, p. 1715, § 205, effective October 1.

L. 2020:

(1)(s)(III) added, (HB 20-1406), ch. 178, p. 813, § 16, effective June 29.

Editor's note:

Subsection (1)(w)(II) provided for the repeal of subsection (1)(w), effective January 1, 2004. (See L. 2002, p. 360.)

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending subsections (1)(a) and (1)(s)(I) and enacting subsection (1)(w), see section 1 of chapter 121, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

28-3-107. Department of military and veterans affairs fund - creation.

Any gifts, grants, and donations accepted by the adjutant general pursuant to section 28-3-106 (1)(x) shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the department of military and veterans affairs fund, which fund is hereby created and referred to in this section as the "fund". The moneys in the fund shall be invested by the state treasurer as provided in sections 24-36-109, 24-36-112, and 24-36-113, C.R.S. Any unexpended and unencumbered moneys remaining in the fund at the end of any fiscal year shall remain in the fund and shall not revert or be credited or transferred to the general fund or be transferred to any other fund. Any interest or income derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the fund shall remain in the fund and shall not be credited to the general fund. Moneys in the fund shall be continuously appropriated to the department for use by the adjutant general to carry out the functions and duties set forth in this title.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 1908, § 3, effective August 6.

28-3-108. Distance learning cash fund - creation.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the distance learning cash fund, referred to in this section as the "fund", which shall consist of the cash fees generated by the public and private use of distance learning facilities pursuant to section 28-3-106 (1)(y). The moneys in the fund shall be invested by the state treasurer as provided in sections 24-36-109, 24-36-112, and 24-36-113, C.R.S. Any unexpended and unencumbered moneys remaining in the fund at the end of any fiscal year shall remain in the fund and shall not revert or be credited or transferred to the general fund or be transferred to any other fund. Any interest or income derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the fund shall remain in the fund and shall not be credited to the general fund. The moneys in the fund shall be continuously appropriated and shall be used to defray the costs associated with operating the distance learning facilities and equipment. Such costs shall include, but need not be limited to, repair, replacement, and salaries involved in the use of said facilities as well as the maintenance and operation of the facilities and equipment.

Source:

L. 2003:

Entire section added, p. 1908, § 3, effective August 6.

28-3-109. Chargeable quarters and billeting cash fund - creation.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the chargeable quarters and billeting cash fund, referred to in this section as the "fund", which shall consist of any moneys generated through the public or private use of the Colorado Army National Guard facilities managed pursuant to section 28-3-106 (1)(q). The moneys in the fund shall be invested by the state treasurer as provided in sections 24-36-109, 24-36-112, and 24-36-113, C.R.S. Any unexpended and unencumbered moneys remaining in the fund at the end of any fiscal year shall remain in the fund and shall not revert or be credited or transferred to the general fund or be transferred to any other fund. Any interest or income derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the fund shall remain in the fund and shall not be credited to the general fund. The moneys in the fund shall be continuously appropriated and shall be used to defray the costs associated with operating National Guard training facilities and associated quarters and billeting facilities. Such costs shall include, but need not be limited to, repair, replacement, and salaries involved in the use of the National Guard training facilities as well as the maintenance and operation of the National Guard training facilities.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire section added, (HB 11-1237), ch. 223, p. 957, § 1, effective August 10.